Delaware, session 153, SB157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 906, Title 10 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 906. Judges; selection; designation; qualifications; terms; vacancies; salaries. (b) The Court shall be composed of 17 Judges 18 Judges of equal judicial authority. One Judge shall be the Chief Judge. No more than a majority of 1 Judge shall be members of the same political party. (e) All of the Judges shall be residents of the State for a period of 5 years immediately prior to their appointment. The Chief Judge may reside in any county of the State. After appointment, 10 of the Judges shall reside in New Castle County, 3 Judges shall reside in Kent County, and 3 Judges 4 Judges shall reside in Sussex County.